Connecticut, session 2026, SB00254.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to taxable years
commencing on and after July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Affordable housing" has the same meaning as provided in section
8-39a of the general statutes;
(2) "Commercial building" means a structure primarily designed or
used for nonresidential purposes, including, but not limited to, as a
hotel, retail space, office space or an industrial building;
(3) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Housing;
(4) "Conversion plan" means any construction plan and specifications
for the proposed conversion of a commercial building into a residential
development that contains sufficient detail to enable the commissioner
to evaluate compliance with the standards developed under the
provisions of subsections (c) and (k) of this section;
LCO No. 1690 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 254
(5) "Dwelling unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 47a-
1 of the general statutes;
(6) "Industrial building" means a structure that is used primarily for
industrial activity and that is generally not open to the public, including
but not limited to, warehouses, factories and storage facilities;
(7) "Nonprofit corporation" means a nonprofit corporation
incorporated pursuant to chapter 602 of the general statutes or any
predecessor statutes thereto, and having as one of its purposes the
construction, conversion, ownership or operation of housing;
(8) "Owner" means (A) any taxpayer filing a state of Connecticut tax
return who possesses title to a commercial building, or prospective title
in the form of a purchase agreement or option to purchase a commercial
building to be converted into a residential development, or (B) a
nonprofit corporation that possesses such title or prospective title;
(9) "Qualified conversion expenditure" means any cost incurred for
the physical construction involved in the conversion of a commercial
building into a residential development. "Qualified conversion
expenditure" does not include: (A) The owner's personal labor, (B) the
cost of site improvements, unless to provide building access to persons
with disabilities, (C) the cost of a new addition, except as may be
required to comply with any provision of the State Building Code, State
Fire Prevention Code or the State Fire Safety Code, (D) any cost
associated with the conversion of an outbuilding, unless such building
contains one or more dwelling units, and (E) any nonconstruction cost
such as architectural fees, legal fees and financing fees; and
(10) "Residential development" means a structure that contains one
or more dwelling units.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Housing shall
establish a program to administer a system of tax credit vouchers within
the resources, requirements and purposes of this section for owners
LCO No. 1690 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 254
converting commercial buildings into residential developments or
taxpayers making contributions that are qualified conversion
expenditures. Any owner eligible to apply for a tax credit voucher
pursuant to this section shall be eligible for such voucher in an amount
equal to ten per cent of the total qualified conversion expenditure.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall develop
standards for the approval of tax credit vouchers for the conversion of
commercial buildings into residential developments for which a tax
credit voucher is sought. Any such standards shall take into account
whether such conversion will create or preserve units for affordable
housing. The commissioner shall post such standards on the
Department of Housing's Internet web site.
(d) Prior to beginning any conversion work on a commercial building
for which an owner will seek a tax credit voucher under this section,
such owner shall submit to the commissioner (1) a conversion plan for
a determination of whether such plan meets any standards developed
under the provisions of subsections (c) and (k) of this section, (2) an
estimate of the qualified conversion expenditures made, and (3) any
other information prescribed by the commissioner. Not later than sixty
days after receipt of such plan, estimate and other information, the
commissioner shall determine whether such plan conforms to the
standards developed under the provisions of subsections (c) and (k) of
this section.
(e) If the commissioner certifies that the conversion plan conforms to
the standards developed under the provisions of subsections (c) and (k)
of this section, the commissioner shall reserve for the benefit of the
owner an allocation for a tax credit equivalent to ten per cent of the
projected qualified conversion expenditures.
(f) Following the completion of the conversion of a commercial
building into a residential development, the owner shall notify the
commissioner that such conversion has been completed. The owner
LCO No. 1690 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 254
shall provide the commissioner with documentation of any work
performed on the commercial building and shall certify the cost
incurred in converting such building into a residential development.
The commissioner shall review such conversion work and verify its
compliance with the conversion plan. Following such verification, the
commissioner shall issue a tax credit voucher to either the owner
converting the commercial building or the taxpayer named by the
owner as contributing to the conversion. The tax credit voucher shall be
in an amount equivalent to the lesser of (1) the tax credit reserved upon
certification of the conversion plan under the provisions of subsection
(e) of this section, or (2) ten per cent of the actual qualified conversion
expenditures. In order to obtain a credit against any state tax due that is
specified in subsection (h) of this section, the holder of the tax credit
voucher shall file the voucher with the holder's state tax return.
(g) The owner of a commercial building converted into a residential
development shall not be eligible for a tax credit voucher under
subsections (f) and (h) of this section, unless the owner incurs qualified
conversion expenditures exceeding fifteen thousand dollars.
(h) (1) The Commissioner of Revenue Services shall grant a credit
against the tax imposed under chapter 229 or 208a of the general
statutes, as applicable, in accordance with the following:
(A) (i) For a taxpayer described under subparagraph (A) of
subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this section holding a tax credit
voucher issued on or after January 1, 2027, under subsections (b) to (g),
inclusive, of this section, against the tax imposed under chapter 229 of
100 the general statutes in the amount specified in the tax credit voucher.
101 (ii) If the amount of the tax credit voucher exceeds the taxpayer's
102 liability for the tax imposed under chapter 229 of the general statutes,
103 the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall treat such excess as an
104 overpayment and, except as provided under section 12-739 or 12-742 of
105 the general statutes, shall refund the amount of such excess, without
LCO No. 1690 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 254
106 interest, to the taxpayer; and
107 (B) (i) For an owner that is a nonprofit corporation holding a tax credit
108 voucher issued on or after January 1, 2027, under subsections (b) to (g),
109 inclusive, of this section, against the tax due under chapter 208a of the
110 general statutes in the amount specified in the tax credit voucher.
111 (ii) Any unused portion of such credit under this subparagraph may
112 be carried forward to any or all of the four income years following the
113 year in which the tax credit voucher is issued.
114 (2) The Commissioner of Housing shall provide a copy of the voucher
115 issued under subsection (f) of this section to the Commissioner of
116 Revenue Services upon the request of the Commissioner of Revenue
117 Services.
118 (i) A credit issued under this section shall not exceed thirty thousand
119 dollars per dwelling unit for a commercial building converted into a
120 residential development for an owner that is not a nonprofit
121 corporation, or not exceed fifty thousand dollars per such dwelling unit
122 for an owner that is a nonprofit corporation.
123 (j) The aggregate amount of all tax credits that may be reserved by
124 the Commissioner of Housing upon certification of conversion plans
125 under subsections (b) to (d), inclusive, of this section shall not exceed
126 three million dollars in any one fiscal year.
127 (k) The Commissioner of Housing may, in consultation with the
128 Commissioner of Revenue Services, adopt regulations in accordance
129 with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes to carry out the
130 purposes of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO No. 1690 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 254
Section 1 July 1, 2026, and New section
applicable to taxable years
commencing on and after
July 1, 2026